Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4785.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [609.5523] THEFT OF PUBLIC FUNDS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Government entity" has the meaning given in section 13.02, subdivision 7a. new text end new text begin (c) "Public funds" means money from all general, special, permanent, trust, and other funds, regardless of source or purpose, held or administered by a government entity. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Acts constituting theft of public funds. new text end new text begin Whoever does any of the following commits theft of public funds and may be sentenced as provided in subdivision 3: new text end new text begin (1) intentionally and without claim of right takes, uses, transfers, conceals, or retains possession of public funds of a government entity or a third party administering a program funded by public vendors without consent and with intent to deprive the government entity permanently of possession of public funds; new text end new text begin (2) obtains for the actor or another the possession or custody of public funds from a government entity or a third party administering a program funded by public funds by intentionally deceiving the government entity or third party with a false representation that is known to be false, is made with intent to defraud, and does defraud the government entity or third party. False representation includes but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (i) a promise made with intent not to perform. Failure to perform is not evidence of intent not to perform unless corroborated by other substantial evidence; or new text end new text begin (ii) the preparation or filing of a claim for reimbursement, a rate application, or a cost report which intentionally and falsely states the costs of or actual services provided by a vendor; or new text end new text begin (3) by swindling, whether by artifice, trick, device, or any other means, obtains public funds or services funded by public funds from a government entity or a third party administering a program funded by public funds. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Sentence. new text end new text begin (a) Whoever commits theft of public funds may be sentenced to imprisonment: new text end new text begin (1) for not more than 24 years or to payment of a fine of not more than $100,000, or both, if the value of the property stolen is more than $35,000; new text end new text begin (2) for not more than 12 years or to payment of a fine of not more than $20,000, or both, if the value of the property stolen exceeds $5,000; or new text end new text begin (3) for not more than six years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both, if the value of the property stolen is more than $1,000 but not more than $5,000. new text end new text begin (b) In a prosecution for theft of public funds, the value of the money or property received by the defendant in violation of any of these provisions within a six-month period may be aggregated and the defendant charged accordingly. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end